Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
PART 3 Rural Telephone Cooperatives

46-5-60.
Short title.

This part may be cited as the “Rural Telephone Cooperative Act.”

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 192, § 1.

46-5-61.
Declaration of purpose.

Cooperative nonprofit corporations may be organized under this part for the purpose of furnishing telephone service in rural areas to the widest practicable number of users of such service. In addition to furnishing telephone service, such cooperative nonprofit corporations may also furnish broadband services directly or indirectly through a contractual arrangement or through a broadband affiliate.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 192, § 2; Ga. L. 2019, p. 233, § 1/SB 17.

The 2019 amendment,

effective April 26, 2019, added the last sentence in this Code section.

Cross references.

Nonprofit corporations generally, §

14-3-101

et seq.

46-5-62.
Definitions.

As used in this part, the term:

(.1)

“Broadband affiliate” means any person which directly or indirectly controls, is controlled by, or is under common control of one or more cooperatives and which is used to provide broadband services.

(.2)

“Broadband services” means a wired or wireless service that consists of the capability to transmit data to and from end users and in combination with such service provides:

Access to the internet; or

Computer processing, information storage, or protocol conversion.

Such term shall include any facilities and equipment associated with such a service and any application or information content to be provided over such a service.

“Cooperative” means any corporation organized under this part or which becomes subject to this part.

“Person” means any natural person, firm, association, corporation, business trust, or partnership.

“Rural area” means any area within this state which is located outside:

“Telephone company” means any natural person, firm, association, corporation, partnership, cooperative nonprofit membership corporation, or limited dividend or mutual association owning, leasing, or operating any line, facility, or system used in the furnishing of telephone service within this state.

“Telephone service” means any communication service whereby voice communication through the use of electricity and wire connections between the transmitting and receiving apparatus is the principal intended use thereof. This term shall include all telephone lines, facilities, or systems used in the rendition of such service.

(A)

The boundaries of an incorporated or unincorporated city, town, village, or borough having a population in excess of 15,000 inhabitants according to the last preceding federal census; and

(B)

Any suburban or populated area contiguous to the boundaries of any such city, town, village, or borough, which area has a common economic, social, or administrative interest with any such city, town, village, or borough.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 192, § 3; Ga. L. 1952, p. 4, § 1; Ga. L. 2019, p. 233, § 2/SB 17.

The 2019 amendment,

effective April 26, 2019, added paragraphs (.1) and (.2), and in subparagraph (3)(A), substituted “15,000 inhabitants” for “1,500 inhabitants”.

46-5-63.
Powers of cooperatives generally.

A cooperative shall have power:

To sue and be sued in its corporate name;

To have an initial existence for a term of 50 years with right of renewal for one or more like terms unless a shorter term is stated in the articles of incorporation;

To adopt a corporate seal and alter the same;

To furnish, improve, and expand telephone service in rural areas to its members, to governmental agencies and political subdivisions, and to other persons not in excess of 10 percent of the number of its members; provided, however, that, without regard to this 10 percent limitation, telephone service may be made available by a cooperative through interconnection of facilities to any number of subscribers of other telephone systems and through pay stations to any number of users; provided, further, that a cooperative which acquires existing telephone facilities in rural areas may continue service to persons, not in excess of 40 percent of the number of its members, who are already receiving service from such facilities without requiring such persons to become members; but such persons may become members upon such terms as may be prescribed in the bylaws; provided, further, that no cooperative shall furnish any telephone service in any area or territory professed to be served by any other telephone company unless such telephone company is unable or unwilling to furnish or extend reasonably adequate telephone service in such area or territory;

(4.1)

To furnish, improve, and expand broadband services. Such broadband services may be furnished separately from telephone service or in conjunction with telephone service and may be furnished in areas that are the same or in areas that are different from those to which the cooperative furnishes telephone service; provided, however, that unless otherwise provided in Code Section 46-5-167, none of the costs of providing broadband services shall be eligible for recovery from the Universal Access Fund provided for in Code Section 46-5-167;

(4.2)

To apply for, accept, repay, and utilize loans, grants, and other financing from any person or from the federal government or any state, or any department or agency thereof, to assist such cooperative or its broadband affiliate in the planning, engineering, construction, extension, provision, operation, repair, and maintenance of broadband services;

(4.3)

To enter into contracts, agreements, partnerships, or other types of business relationships with any person or with the federal government or any state or local government, or any department or agency thereof, to assist such cooperative or its broadband affiliate in the planning, engineering, construction, extension, provision, operation, repair, and maintenance of broadband services;

To construct, purchase, lease as lessee, or otherwise acquire; to improve, expand, install, equip, maintain, and operate; and to sell, assign, convey, lease as lessor, mortgage, pledge, or otherwise dispose of or encumber telephone lines, facilities, systems, lands, buildings, structures, plants, equipment, exchanges, and any other real or personal property, whether tangible or intangible, which shall be deemed necessary, convenient, or appropriate to accomplish the purpose for which the cooperative is organized, provided that no cooperative shall construct, purchase, lease as lessee, take, receive, or otherwise acquire, improve, expand, install, equip, maintain, or operate any telephone lines, facilities, systems, lands, buildings, structures, plants, equipment, exchanges, or any other real or personal property, whether tangible or intangible, within (A) the boundaries of any incorporated or unincorporated city, town, village, or borough within this state having a population in excess of 15,000 inhabitants according to the last preceding federal census, and (B) any suburban or populated area contiguous to the boundaries of any such city, town, village, or borough having a common economic, social, or administrative interest within any such city, town, village, or borough;

To connect and interconnect its telephone lines, facilities, or systems with other telephone lines, facilities, or systems, provided that any such connection or interconnection shall be in such manner and according to such specifications as will avoid interference with or hazards to existing telephone lines, facilities, or systems;

To make its facilities available to persons furnishing telephone service within or without this state;

To purchase, lease as lessee, or otherwise acquire; to use and exercise; and to sell, assign, convey, mortgage, pledge, or otherwise dispose of or encumber franchises, rights, privileges, licenses, and easements;

To issue membership certificates and nonvoting shares of stock as provided in this part;

To borrow money and otherwise contract indebtedness; to issue or guarantee notes, bonds, and other evidences of indebtedness; and to secure the payment thereof by mortgage, pledge, deed of trust, security deed, or any other encumbrance upon any or all of its then-owned or after-acquired real or personal property, assets, franchises, or revenues;

To construct, maintain, and operate telephone lines along, upon, under, and across publicly owned lands and public thoroughfares, including all roads, highways, streets, alleys, bridges, and causeways, provided that the construction, maintenance, and operation of telephone lines along, upon, under, and across publicly owned lands and public thoroughfares, including all roads, highways, streets, alleys, bridges, and causeways, shall be conditioned upon first having obtained the consent and permission of the governmental authority affected and shall be under such terms and conditions as may be promulgated by that governmental authority;

To exercise the power of eminent domain in the manner provided by Title 22 for the exercise of such power by other corporations constructing or operating telephone lines, facilities, or systems;

To become a member of other cooperatives or corporations or to own stock therein;

To conduct its business and exercise its powers within or without this state;

To adopt, amend, and repeal bylaws;

To make any and all contracts necessary, convenient, or appropriate for the full exercise of the powers granted by this part; and

To do and perform any other acts and things and to have and exercise any other powers which may be necessary, convenient, or appropriate to accomplish the purpose for which the cooperative is organized.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 192, § 4; Ga. L. 1952, p. 4, § 2; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 132, § 1; Ga. L. 1973, p. 229, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 2107, § 48; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 46; Ga. L. 1994, p. 237, § 2; Ga. L. 2019, p. 233, § 3/SB 17.

The 2019 amendment,

effective April 26, 2019, added paragraphs (4.1) through (4.3), and substituted “15,000 inhabitants” for “1,500 inhabitants” in paragraph (5).

46-5-64.
Power of superior court to create cooperatives, to approve amendments to their articles of incorporation, conversion, consolidation, merger, or dissolution.

The superior court shall have power, by compliance with this part, to create cooperatives, to approve amendments to articles of incorporation of cooperatives, to approve articles of conversion and combined articles of consolidation and conversion of existing corporations proposing to become subject to this part, to approve articles of consolidation of cooperatives, to approve articles of merger of cooperatives, and to approve articles of dissolution of cooperatives. The judges of the superior court are authorized and empowered to make orders and decrees pursuant to this part in vacation at chambers in the county where the application for such order or decree is pending or in any county forming a part of the judicial circuit in which the application is pending, in the same manner and as fully and amply as the said judges could do in term time.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 192, § 5.

Cross references.

Provisions of Constitution of Georgia relating to granting of corporate powers and privileges, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. VI, Para. V.

46-5-64.1.
Venue determinations.

Venue in proceedings against a cooperative shall be determined in accordance with the Constitution of Georgia and this Code section.

Unless otherwise required by the Constitution of Georgia, a cooperative may be sued only in the county of its residence, as described below:

Each cooperative authorized to transact business in this state shall be deemed to reside in the county where its registered office is maintained. If any such cooperative fails to maintain a registered office, it shall be deemed to reside in the county in this state where its last named registered office or principal office, as shown by the records of the Secretary of State, was maintained;

Each cooperative authorized to transact business in this state shall be deemed to reside and may be sued on contracts in the county in which the contract sought to be enforced was made or is to be performed, if it has an office and transacts business in that county; or

Each cooperative authorized to transact business in this state shall be deemed to reside, and may be sued for damages because of torts, wrong, or injury done, in the county where the cause of action originated, if it has an office and transacts business in that county.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-5-64.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 352, § 7/SB 46.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2017.

46-5-65.
Names of cooperatives.

The name of the cooperative shall include the words “Telephone” and “Cooperative,” and the abbreviation “Inc.” unless:

In an affidavit made by its president and vice-president and filed with the clerk of the superior court of the county in which the principal office of the cooperative is located and with the Secretary of State; or

In an affidavit made by a person signing articles of incorporation, consolidation, merger, or conversion, which relate to such cooperative, and presented concurrently with the presentation for approval of any such articles to the superior court or a judge thereof and filed with the Secretary of State

it shall appear that the cooperative desires to do business in another state and is or would be precluded therefrom by reason of the inclusion of such words or either thereof in its name.

This Code section shall not apply to any corporation which becomes subject to this part by complying with Code Section 46-5-90 or which does business in this state pursuant to Code Section 46-5-99 and which elects to retain a corporate name which does not comply with this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 192, § 6.

46-5-66.
Incorporators.

Five or more persons, including cooperatives, may organize a cooperative in the manner provided in this part.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 192, § 7.

46-5-67.
Contents of articles of incorporation; signing and acknowledgment; recitation of purpose and powers; statements regarding issuance of nonvoting shares of stock.

Articles of incorporation of a cooperative shall recite that they are executed pursuant to this part; shall state the name of the cooperative, the address of its principal office, the names and addresses of the incorporators, and the names and addresses of its trustees; and may contain any provisions, not inconsistent with this part, which are deemed necessary or advisable for the conduct of its business, including provisions for the issuance of nonvoting shares of stock as provided in this Code section.

Such articles shall be signed by each incorporator and acknowledged by at least two of the incorporators. If the incorporators are cooperatives, the articles shall be signed by representatives of each cooperative and acknowledged by representatives of at least two cooperatives.

It shall not be necessary to recite in the articles of incorporation of a cooperative the purpose for which it is organized or any of its corporate powers.

If a cooperative desires to issue nonvoting shares of stock, its articles of incorporation shall state:

The total number of such shares of stock which may be issued and the par value of each share;

The fixed or maximum rate of dividends on the par value of such shares of stock, in either case not exceeding 4 percent per annum, and whether dividends shall be cumulative or noncumulative;

Whether such shares of stock may be issued to members only or to members and nonmembers;

The maximum number of such shares of stock which may be owned by any person; and

The terms and conditions on which such shares of stock may be transferred, redeemed, and retired.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 192, § 8.

46-5-68.
Presentation of articles of incorporation to superior court for approval; accompaniment of articles by Secretary of State’s certificate and by required affidavits.

The articles of incorporation, executed and acknowledged in accordance with Code Section 46-5-67, shall be presented, by application signed by two of the persons who signed the articles of incorporation, to the superior court of the county in which the principal office of the cooperative is to be located, or to the judge of the superior court of that county in vacation, or in the event that the judge of the superior court of said county is absent from the circuit, disqualified, or for illness or other reason cannot act in the premises, then to any judge of the superior court of this state. The application shall be accompanied by a certificate of the Secretary of State declaring that the name of the proposed cooperative is not the name of any other then existing corporation registered in the records of the Secretary of State, and by such affidavits as may be required by applicable provisions of this part.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 192, § 9.

46-5-69.
Approval of articles by judicial order; application as constituting charter of cooperative.

Upon presentation of the articles of incorporation to the superior court, or to the judge of the superior court, the judge shall examine the same and if it shall appear to the judge that the articles of incorporation are legitimately within the purview and intention of the laws of this state, the judge shall pass an order approving the articles of incorporation. The application, including the articles of incorporation and the order thereon, shall constitute the charter of the cooperative named therein.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 192, § 10.

46-5-70.
Filing of articles with clerk of court.

The applicants shall file the application, including the articles of incorporation and the order of the judge thereon, in the office of the clerk of the superior court of the county in which the principal office of the cooperative is to be located.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 192, § 11; Ga. L. 2010, p. 9, § 1-85/HB 1055.

The 2010 amendment,

effective May 12, 2010, deleted “, and shall concurrently therewith deposit with and pay to said clerk the fee provided for in Code Section 46-5-100” following “located” at the end of this Code section.

46-5-71.
Submittal to clerk of publisher’s affidavit.

The applicants shall submit to the clerk, along with the articles of incorporation, an affidavit signed by the duly authorized agent or publisher of a newspaper having general circulation in the county where the principal office of the cooperative is to be located, which affidavit shall state that there has been deposited with the newspaper the cost of publishing the articles of incorporation and the order of the judge thereon once a week for four weeks.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 192, § 12.

46-5-72.
Time of advertisement of articles; appearance of advertisements prior to granting of charter.

The first of said advertisements shall appear within one week after the filing of the articles of incorporation as provided in Code Section 46-5-70 unless otherwise ordered by the court. It shall not be necessary that any of the advertisements appear prior to the granting of the charter by the judge.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 192, § 13.

46-5-73.
Duty of clerk to deliver to applicants certified copies of articles and of order thereon.

Upon the filing of the articles of incorporation and the order of the judge thereon with the clerk of the superior court, the clerk shall forthwith deliver to the applicants or their attorney two certified copies of the articles of incorporation and the order of the judge and the filing of the clerk thereon.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 192, § 14; Ga. L. 2010, p. 9, § 1-86/HB 1055.

The 2010 amendment,

effective May 12, 2010, deleted “and the fee being paid as required by Code Section 46-5-70” following “court”, deleted “thereon,” following “judge”, and deleted “and receipt for the cost which has been paid to the clerk” following “thereon” at the end.

46-5-74.
Filing of copies of articles and order with Secretary of State; payment of fee.

Upon receiving the two certified copies of the articles of incorporation and the order of the judge thereon, the applicants or their attorney shall present the same to the Secretary of State for registration and recordation and shall concurrently therewith pay to the Secretary of State for the use of the state the fee provided for in Code Section 46-5-100.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 192, § 15; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 46; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 46.

46-5-75.
Certificate of Secretary of State.

The Secretary of State shall thereupon attach to one of the certified copies of the articles of incorporation with order of the judge thereon, which articles of incorporation with the order of the judge thereon constitute the charter of the corporation as granted by the superior court, a certificate in substantially the following form:

State of Georgia Office of the Secretary of State Ex Officio Corporation Commissioner This is to certify that (the name of the corporation) has been duly incorporated under the laws of the State of Georgia, on the day of , , for a period of years from said date, in accordance with the certified copy hereto attached, and that a certified copy of the articles of incorporation constituting the charter of said corporation has duly been filed in the office of the Secretary of State and the fees therefor paid, as provided by law. Witness my hand and official seal, this day of , . Secretary of State, Ex Officio Corporation Commissioner of the State of Georgia

Click to view

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 192, § 16; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 46; Ga. L. 1999, p. 81, § 46.

46-5-76.
Certified copies of charter and Secretary of State’s certificate as evidence of incorporation of cooperative and of nature and contents of charter.

Such certified copies of the charter, together with the certificate of the Secretary of State thereon, shall be received as evidence in any court or proceeding as evidence of the incorporation of the cooperative and of the nature and contents of its charter.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 192, § 17.

46-5-77.
Time of corporate existence of cooperative.

The corporate existence of the cooperative shall begin at the time of the filing of the articles of incorporation, with the judge’s order thereon, with the clerk of the superior court, but the cooperative shall not be licensed to transact any business until it shall have received the certificate from the Secretary of State in the manner prescribed in Code Section 46-5-75.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 192, § 18.

46-5-78.
Bylaws of cooperative generally.

The board of directors shall adopt the first bylaws of a cooperative to be adopted following an incorporation, conversion, combined consolidation and conversion, merger, or consolidation. Thereafter, the board of directors shall have the power to alter, amend, or repeal the bylaws, or adopt new bylaws, unless such power is reserved exclusively to the members of the cooperative by this part, the articles of incorporation, or bylaws previously adopted by the members; provided, however, that any bylaws adopted by the board of directors may be altered, amended, or repealed and new bylaws may be adopted by the members. The members may prescribe that any bylaws adopted by them shall not be altered, amended, or repealed by the board of directors. The members may adopt, amend, or repeal the bylaws by the affirmative vote of a majority of those members voting thereon at a meeting of the members. The bylaws shall set forth the rights and duties of members, directors, and shareholders, if any, and may contain other provisions for the regulation and management of the affairs of the cooperative not inconsistent with this part or with its articles of incorporation.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 192, § 19; Ga. L. 2017, p. 352, § 8/SB 46.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, substituted “the board of directors shall have the power to alter, amend, or repeal the bylaws, or adopt new bylaws, unless such power is reserved exclusively to the members of the cooperative by this part, the articles of incorporation, or bylaws previously adopted by the members; provided, however, that any bylaws adopted by the board of directors may be altered, amended, or repealed and new bylaws may be adopted by the members.
The members may prescribe that any bylaws adopted by them shall not be altered, amended, or repealed by the board of directors.
The members may adopt” for “Thereafter, the members shall adopt”.

46-5-79.
Qualifications for membership in cooperative; certificate of membership; share certificates; payment for shares of stock.

Each incorporator of a cooperative shall be a member thereof, but no other person may become a member thereof unless he agrees to use telephone service furnished by the cooperative when it is made available through its facilities. Membership in a cooperative shall be evidenced by a certificate of membership, which shall not be transferable, except as provided in the bylaws. The bylaws may prescribe additional qualifications and limitations in respect of membership, provided that ownership of shares of stock, if any are authorized, shall not be a condition of membership in the cooperative.

If the issuance of shares of stock is provided for in the articles of incorporation, ownership of such shares shall be evidenced by share certificates. No share of stock shall be issued except for cash, or for property at its fair value, in an amount equal to the par value of such share of stock.

Membership and share certificates shall contain such provisions, consistent with this part and the articles of incorporation of the cooperative, as shall be prescribed by its bylaws.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 192, § 20.

46-5-80.
Meetings of members — Generally.

An annual meeting of the members of a cooperative shall be held at such time and place as shall be provided in the bylaws.

Special meetings of the members may be called by the president, by the board of directors, by any three directors, or by not less than 200 members or 10 percent of all members, whichever is less.

Except as otherwise provided in this part, written or printed notice stating the time and place of each meeting of the members and, in the case of a special meeting, the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called, shall be given to each member, either personally or by mail, not less than ten days nor more than 25 days before the date of the meeting. If mailed, such notice shall be deemed to be given when deposited in the United States mail with postage prepaid, addressed to the member at his address as it appears on the records of the cooperative.

Unless the bylaws prescribe the presence of a greater percentage or number of the members for a quorum, a quorum for the transaction of business at all meetings of the members of a cooperative having not more than 500 members shall be 10 percent of all members present in person. A quorum for a cooperative having more than 500 members shall be 50 members or 2 percent of all members, whichever is greater, present in person. If less than a quorum is present at any meeting, a majority of those present in person may adjourn the meeting to another time without the giving of notice of such later meeting to absent members.

Each member shall be entitled to one vote on each matter submitted to a vote at a meeting of the members. Voting shall be in person, but, if the bylaws so provide, may also be by mail.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 192, § 21.

46-5-81.
Meetings of members — Waiver of notice.

Any person entitled to notice of a meeting may waive such notice in writing either before or after such meeting. If any such person attends such meeting, such attendance shall constitute a waiver of notice of such meeting, unless such person participates therein solely to object to the transaction of any business because the meeting has not been legally called or convened.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 192, § 22.

46-5-82.
Board of directors.

The business of a cooperative shall be managed by a board of not less than five directors, each of whom shall be a member of the cooperative or of another cooperative which is a member thereof. The bylaws shall prescribe the number of directors, their qualifications, other than those prescribed in this part, the manner of holding meetings of the board of directors and of electing successors to directors who resign, die, or otherwise become incapable of acting. The bylaws may also provide for the removal of directors from office and for the election of their successors. Directors shall not receive any salaries for their services as such and, except in emergencies, shall not receive any salaries for their services in any other capacity without the approval of the members. The bylaws may, however, prescribe a fixed fee for attendance at each meeting of the board of directors and may provide for reimbursement of actual expenses of attendance.

The directors of a cooperative named in any articles of incorporation, consolidation, merger, conversion, or combined consolidation and conversion shall hold office until the next annual meeting of the members and until their successors are elected and qualify. At each annual meeting, or, in case of failure to hold the annual meeting as specified in the bylaws, at a special meeting called for that purpose, the members shall elect directors to hold office until the next annual meeting of the members, except as otherwise provided in this part. Each director shall hold office for the term for which he is elected and until his successor is elected and qualifies.

Instead of electing all the directors annually, the bylaws may provide that half of them, or a number as near thereto as possible, shall be elected to serve until the next annual meeting of the members and that the remaining directors shall be elected to serve until the second succeeding annual meeting. Thereafter, as directors’ terms expire, the members shall elect their successors to serve until the second succeeding annual meeting after their election. Instead of electing all of the directors annually or biannually, the bylaws may provide that one-third of them, or a number as near thereto as possible, shall be elected to serve until the next annual meeting of the members, that one-third shall be elected to serve until the second succeeding annual meeting of the members, and that the remaining directors shall be elected to serve until the third succeeding annual meeting. Thereafter, as directors’ terms expire, the members shall elect their successors to serve until the third succeeding annual meeting after their election.

A majority of the board of directors shall constitute a quorum.

The board of directors may exercise all of the powers of a cooperative not conferred upon the members by this part, or by its articles of incorporation or bylaws.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 192, § 23.

46-5-83.
Division of service territory into districts; election of district delegates; boundaries of districts; voting by members at district meetings and by district delegates at any meeting.

The bylaws may provide for the division of the territory served or to be served by a cooperative into two or more districts for any purpose, including, without limitation, the nomination and election of directors and the election and functioning of district delegates. Such delegates, who shall be members, may nominate and elect directors. The bylaws shall prescribe the boundaries of the districts or the manner of establishing such boundaries, the manner of changing such boundaries, and the manner in which such districts shall function. No member at any district meeting, and no district delegate at any meeting, shall vote by proxy or by mail.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 192, § 24.

46-5-84.
Officers of cooperative.

The officers of a cooperative shall consist of a president, vice-president, secretary, and treasurer, who shall be elected annually by and from the board of directors. When a person holding any such office ceases to be a director, he shall cease to hold such office. The offices of secretary and of treasurer may be held by the same person. The board of directors may also elect or appoint such other officers, agents, or employees as it deems necessary or advisable and shall prescribe their powers and duties. Any officer may be removed from office and his successor elected in the manner prescribed in the bylaws.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 192, § 25.

46-5-85.
Amendment of articles of incorporation.

A cooperative may amend its articles of incorporation by complying with the requirements of this Code section, provided that a change of location of principal office may be effected in the manner set forth in Code Section 46-5-86.

The proposed amendment shall be presented to a meeting of the members, the notice of which shall set forth or have attached thereto the proposed amendment. If the proposed amendment, with any changes, is approved by the affirmative vote of not less than two-thirds of those members voting thereon at such meeting, articles of amendment shall be executed and acknowledged on behalf of the cooperative by its president or vice-president, and its seal shall be affixed thereto and attested by its secretary.

The articles of amendment shall recite that they are executed pursuant to this part and shall state:

The name of the cooperative;

The address of its principal office; and

The amendment to its articles of incorporation.

The president or vice-president executing such articles of amendment shall make and annex thereto an affidavit stating that the provisions of this Code section in regard to the amendment set forth in such articles were duly complied with.

An application for approval of the articles of amendment, which application shall include such articles and the prescribed affidavits and which shall be signed and acknowledged by the president or vice-president of the cooperative, shall be presented to and approved by the superior court, or the judge thereof in vacation, filed with the clerk of the superior court of the county in which the principal office of the cooperative is located and with the Secretary of State, and published, in the same manner as an application for incorporation. The fees to be paid at the time of such filing shall be as prescribed in Code Section 46-5-100. Upon such filing, the amendment shall be deemed to be effective.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 192, § 26.

46-5-86.
Change of location of principal office.

A cooperative may, upon authorization of its members or board of directors, change the location of its principal office by compliance with the requirements of this Code section. An application for approval of such change shall be presented to and approved by the superior court of the county in which the principal office of the cooperative is to be located, or to the judge of the superior court in vacation. Upon approval, the application and approval shall be filed with the clerk of the superior court of that county and with the Secretary of State and shall be published in the same manner as an application for incorporation. The application, together with the approval of the judge thereon, shall also be filed with the clerk of the superior court of each county in which the principal office of the cooperative has previously been located. The fees to be paid at the time of such filing shall be as prescribed in Code Section 46-5-100.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 192, § 27.

46-5-87.
Consolidation of cooperatives.

Any two or more cooperatives (each of which is designated in this Code section as a “consolidating cooperative”) may consolidate into a new cooperative (designated in this Code section as the “new cooperative”) by complying with the following requirements:

The proposition for the consolidation of the consolidating cooperatives into the new cooperative, along with proposed articles of consolidation to give effect thereto, shall be submitted to a meeting of the members of each consolidating cooperative, the notice of which shall have attached thereto a copy of the proposed articles of consolidation;

If the proposed consolidation and the proposed articles of consolidation, with any amendments, are approved by the affirmative vote of not less than two-thirds of those members of each consolidating cooperative voting thereon at each such meeting, articles of consolidation in the form approved shall be executed and acknowledged on behalf of each consolidating cooperative by its president or vice-president, and its seal shall be affixed thereto and attested by its secretary. The articles of consolidation shall recite that they are executed pursuant to this part and shall state:

The name of each consolidating cooperative and the address of its principal office;

The name of the new cooperative and the address of its principal office;

That each consolidating cooperative agrees to the consolidation;

The names and addresses of the directors of the new cooperative; and

The terms and conditions of the consolidation and the mode of carrying the same into effect, including the manner in which members and shareholders, if any, of the consolidating cooperatives may or shall become members and shareholders, respectively, of the new cooperative.

In addition, the articles of consolidation may contain any provisions, not inconsistent with this part, deemed necessary or advisable for the conduct of the business of the new cooperative. The president or vice-president of each consolidating cooperative executing such articles of consolidation shall make and annex thereto an affidavit stating that the preceding provisions of this Code section in regard to such articles were duly complied with by such cooperative;

An application for approval of the articles of consolidation, including such articles and the prescribed affidavits, signed and acknowledged by the president or vice-president of each consolidating cooperative, shall be presented to and approved by the superior court, or the judge thereof in vacation, filed with the clerk of the superior court of the county in which the principal office of the new cooperative is to be located and with the Secretary of State, and published in the same manner as an application for incorporation. The fees to be paid at the time of such filing shall be as prescribed in Code Section 46-5-100. Upon such filing, the consolidation shall be deemed to be effective.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 192, § 28.